src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Nouns in the Estonian language inflect for case and number.

!hobune:hobu
LEXICON N-hobune
+N: N-hobune_01 ;

LEXICON N-hobune_01
+Sg+Nom:ne K ;
+Sg+Gen:se K ;
+Sg+Com:sega K ;
:se PLNOM ;
:se PLPAR_id ;

! !koer:koera
LEXICON N-koer
+Sg+Nom:0 # ;
+Sg+Gen:a # ;
+Sg+Com:aga # ;
:a PLNOM ;
 PLPAR_i ;

LEXICON Cases
+N+Sg+Nom:0     # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:d     #   ;

LEXICON PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>d K ;

!two syllable
LEXICON PLPAR_i
+Pl+Par:%>%^Pli     #   ; !laps:lapsi

!One syllable, three syllable
!puu:puid, hobune:hobuseid
LEXICON PLPAR_id
+Pl+Par:%>%^Plid     #   ; !puu:puid

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
